Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
248

COUNTY
BUDGETS; TAX FUNDS

Section

248-1 Definitions

248-2 Repealed

248-2.5 Repealed

248-2.6 County surcharge on state tax; disposition
of proceeds

248-3 State requirements

248-4 Submission of budgets during years
legislature meets

248-5 Repealed

248-6 Repealed

248-7 Tax payments, how made; caveat

Fuel Tax Funds

248-8 Special funds in treasury of State

248-9 State highway fund

248-10 State highway fund; disposition of certain
income

248-11 Repealed

248-12 State highway fund to defray expenses of
motor vehicle

safety office

Revision Note

Throughout this
chapter, "council" and "director of finance" have been
substituted for "board of supervisors" and "treasurer" to
conform to county charters.

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next